District of Columbia statutes.
29-1011.03

Power of legal representative of member.

Unless the organic rules provide for greater rights, if a member is dissociated because of death, dies or is expelled by reason of being adjudged incompetent, the member’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee of the member’s financial rights and, for purposes of settling the estate of a deceased member, may exercise the informational rights of a current member to obtain information under § 29-1005.05.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(7)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09 and § 29-1011.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “legal representative” for “estate” in the section heading.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1103 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.